Maine, session 132, LD964.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 12 MRSA §10001, sub-§60, as affected by PL 2003, c. 614, §9 and
amended by c. 655, Pt. B, §10 and affected by §422, is further amended to read:
60. Sunrise. "Sunrise" means, for a given location in the State, the time computed
and established for sunrise for Bangor, Maine, by the Nautical Almanac Office that location
by the Astronomical Applications Department of the United States Naval Observatory,
converted to the legal standard of time in force in this State on that day.
Sec. 2. 12 MRSA §10001, sub-§61, as affected by PL 2003, c. 614, §9 and
amended by c. 655, Pt. B, §10 and affected by §422, is further amended to read:
61. Sunset. "Sunset" means, for a given location in the State, the time computed and
established for sunset for Bangor, Maine, by the Nautical Almanac Office that location by
the Astronomical Applications Department of the United States Naval Observatory,
converted to the legal standard of time in force in this State on that day.